Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-204] Execution of records.
(a) Each record delivered to the director for filing pursuant to this chapter
shall be executed in the following manner:

(1) A certificate of limited partnership shall be
signed by at least one general partner;

(2) An amendment that changes the status of the
limited partnership as a limited liability limited partnership shall be signed
by at least one general partner who shall certify that a majority of the
general partners have agreed to the amendment;

(3) An amendment designating as a general partner a
person admitted under section 425E-801(3)(B) following the dissociation of a
limited partnership's last general partner shall be signed by the designated
person;

(4) An amendment required by section 425E-803(c)
following the appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited
partnership's activities shall be signed by the appointed person;

(5) Any other amendment shall be signed by:

(A) At least one general partner listed in
the certificate;

(B) Each person designated in the amendment
as a new general partner; and

(C) Each person that the amendment indicates
has dissociated as a general partner, unless:

(i) The person is deceased or a guardian or
general conservator has been appointed for the person and the amendment so
states; or

(ii) The person has previously delivered to the
director for filing a statement of dissociation;

(6) A restated certificate of limited partnership
shall be signed by at least one general partner listed who shall certify that a
majority of the general partners have agreed to the restatement and to the
extent the restated certificate effects a change under any other paragraph of
this subsection, the certificate shall be signed in a manner that satisfies
that paragraph;

(7) A statement of termination shall be signed by at
least one general partner who shall certify that all of the general partners
have agreed to the termination or if the certificate of a dissolved limited
partnership lists no general partners, by the person appointed pursuant to
section 425E-803(c) or (d) to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's
activities;

(8) Articles of conversion shall be signed by at
least one general partner who shall certify that a majority of the general
partners have agreed to the conversion;

(9) Articles of merger shall be signed as provided in
section 425E-1107(a);

(10) Any other record delivered on behalf of a limited
partnership to the director for filing shall be signed by at least one general
partner;

(11) A statement by a person pursuant to section
425E-605(a)(4) stating that the person has dissociated as a general partner
shall be signed by that person;

(12) A statement of withdrawal by a person pursuant to
section 425E-306 shall be signed by that person;

(13) A record delivered on behalf of a foreign limited
partnership to the director for filing shall be signed by at least one general
partner of the foreign limited partnership; and

(14) Any other record delivered on behalf of any
person to the director for filing shall be signed by that person.

(b) Any person may sign by an attorney-in-fact
any record to be filed pursuant to this chapter. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next